Missouri, session 2026, SB980.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 537.675, 537.684, 595.010, 595.040,
and 595.045, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 537.675, 537.684,
595.010, 595.040, and 595.045, to read as follows:
537.675. 1. As used in sections 537.675 through
537.693, the following terms mean:
(1) "Annual claims", that period of time commencing on
the first day of January of every year after December 31,
2002, and ending on the last day of that calendar year;
(2) "Commission", the labor and industrial relations
commission;
(3) "Division", the division of workers' compensation;
(4) "Punitive damage final judgment", an award for
punitive damages excluding interest that is no longer
subject to review by courts of this state or of the United
States;
(5) "Uncompensated tort victim", a person who:
(a) Is a party in a personal injury or wrongful death
lawsuit; or is a tort victim whose claim against the tort-
feasor has been settled for the policy limits of insurance
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 980 2
covering the liability of such tort-feasor and such policy
limits are inadequate in light of the nature and extent of
damages due to the personal injury or wrongful death;
(b) Unless described in paragraph (a) of this
subdivision:
a. Has obtained a final monetary judgment in that
lawsuit described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision
against a tort-feasor for personal injuries, or wrongful
death in a case in which all appeals are final;
b. Has exercised due diligence in enforcing the
judgment; and
c. Has not collected the full amount of the judgment;
(c) Is not a corporation, company, partnership or
other incorporated or unincorporated commercial entity;
(d) Is not any entity claiming a right of subrogation;
(e) Was not on house arrest and was not confined in
any federal, state, regional, county or municipal jail,
prison or other correctional facility at the time he or she
sustained injury from the tort-feasor;
(f) Has not pleaded guilty to or been found guilty of
two or more felonies, where such two or more felonies
occurred within ten years of the occurrence of the tort in
question, and where either of such felonies involved a
controlled substance or an act of violence; [and]
(g) Is a resident of the state of Missouri or
sustained personal injury or death by a tort which occurred
in the state of Missouri; and
(h) Is a citizen of the United States, or is a lawful
permanent resident, or lawfully holds a valid visa issued by
the United States Department of State at the time of the
claim for dispensation.

SB 980 3
2. There is created the "Tort Victims' Compensation
Fund". Unexpended moneys in the fund shall not lapse at the
end of the biennium as provided in section 33.080.
3. Any party receiving a judgment final for purposes
of appeal for punitive damages in any case filed in any
division of any circuit court of the state of Missouri shall
notify the attorney general of the state of Missouri of such
award, except for actions claiming improper health care
pursuant to chapter 538. The state of Missouri shall have a
lien for deposit into the tort victims' compensation fund to
the extent of fifty percent of the punitive damage final
judgment which shall attach in any such case after deducting
attorney's fees and expenses. In each case, the attorney
general shall serve a lien notice by certified mail or
registered mail upon the party or parties against whom the
state has a claim for collection of its share of a punitive
damage final judgment. On a petition filed by the state,
the court, on written notice to all interested parties,
shall adjudicate the rights of the parties and enforce the
lien. The lien shall not be satisfied out of any recovery
until the attorney's claim for fees and expenses is paid.
The state can file its lien in all cases where punitive
damages are awarded upon the entry of the judgment final for
purposes of appeal. The state cannot enforce its lien until
there is a punitive damage final judgment. Cases resolved
by arbitration, mediation or compromise settlement prior to
a punitive damage final judgment are exempt from the
provisions of this section. Nothing in this section shall
hinder or in any way affect the right or ability of the
parties to any claim or lawsuit to compromise or settle such
claim or litigation on any terms and at any time the parties
desire.

SB 980 4
4. The state of Missouri shall have no interest in or
right to intervene at any stage of any judicial proceeding
pursuant to this section, except to enforce its lien rights
as provided in subsection 3 of this section.
5. Twenty-six percent of all payments deposited into
the tort victims' compensation fund and all interest
accruing on the principal regardless of source or
designation shall be transferred to the basic civil legal
services fund established in section 477.650. Moneys in the
tort victims' compensation fund shall not be used to pay any
portion of a refund mandated by Article X, Section 18 of the
Constitution.
6. The department of labor and industrial relations
shall verify compliance with the eligibility requirements of
any claimant under this section prior to authorizing payment
from the tort victims' compensation fund, and shall deny any
claim that fails to meet such requirements.
537.684. 1. A claim for compensation may be filed by
a person eligible for compensation or, if the person is an
incapacitated or disabled person, or a minor, by the
person's spouse, parent, conservator or guardian.
2. A claim shall be filed not later than two years
after the judgment upon which it is based becomes final and
all appeals are final. If there is no judgment, claims must
be filed within time limits prescribed pursuant to section
516.120, except for cases resulting in death, in which case
claims must be filed within time limits prescribed pursuant
to section 537.100.
3. Each claim shall be filed in person or by mail.
The division shall investigate such claim prior to the
opening of formal proceedings. The director of the division
shall assign an administrative law judge, associate

SB 980 5
administrative law judge or legal advisor within the
division to hear any claim for compensation filed. The
claimant shall be notified of the date and time of any
hearing on the claim. In determining the amount of
compensation for which a claimant is eligible, the division
shall:
(1) Consider the facts stated on the application filed
pursuant to section 537.678;
(2) Obtain a copy of the final judgment, if any, from
the appropriate court;
(3) Determine the amount of the loss to the claimant,
or the victim's survivors or dependents; and
(4) If there is no final judgment, determine the
degree or extent to which the victim's acts or conduct
provoked, incited or contributed to the injuries or death of
the victim.
4. The claimant may present evidence and testimony on
his or her own behalf or may retain counsel. The
administrative law judge may, as part of any award entered
under sections 537.675 to 537.693, determine and allow
reasonable attorney's fees, which shall not exceed fifteen
percent of the amount awarded as compensation under sections
537.675 to 537.693, which fee shall be paid out of, but not
in addition to, the amount of compensation, to the attorney
representing the claimant. No attorney for a claimant shall
ask for, contract for, or receive any larger sum than the
amount so allowed.
5. Prior to any hearing, the person filing a claim
shall submit reports, if available, from all hospitals,
physicians or surgeons who treated or examined the victim
for the injury for which compensation is sought. If, in the
opinion of the division, an examination of the injured

SB 980 6
victim or a report on the cause of death of the victim would
be of material aid, the division may appoint a duly
qualified, impartial physician to make an examination and
report. A finding of the judge or jury in the underlying
case shall be considered as evidence.
6. Each and every payment shall be exempt from
attachment, garnishment or any other remedy available to
creditors for the collection of a debt, provided however,
this section shall not in any way affect the right of any
attorney who represents or represented any claimant to
collect any fee or expenses to which he or she is entitled,
provided that attorney's fees awarded from the filing and
adjudication of the claim are determined to be just and
reasonable by the hearing officer and are not to exceed
fifteen percent of the applicant's payment from the tort
victims' compensation fund.
7. Payments of compensation shall not be made directly
to any person legally incompetent to receive them but shall
be made to the parent, guardian or conservator for the
benefit of such minor, disabled or incapacitated person.
8. For payment of all claims from the fund, the
division shall determine the aggregate amount of all awards
made on those claims filed during an annual claims period.
Such determination shall be made on or before the thirtieth
day of June in the next succeeding year. If the aggregate
value of the awards does not exceed the total amount of
money in the fund, then the awards shall be paid in full on
or before the thirtieth day of September in the next
succeeding year. If the aggregate value of the awards does
exceed the total amount of money in the fund, then the
awards shall be paid on a pro rata basis on or before the
thirtieth day of September in the next succeeding year.

SB 980 7
9. If there are no funds available, then no claim
shall be paid until funds have accumulated in the tort
victims' compensation fund and have been appropriated to the
division for payment to uncompensated tort victims. When
sufficient funds become available for payment of claims of
uncompensated tort victims, awards that have been determined
but have not been paid shall be paid in chronological order
with the oldest paid first, based upon the date on which the
application was filed with the division. Any award pursuant
to this subsection that cannot be paid due to a lack of
funds appropriated for payment of claims of uncompensated
tort victims shall not constitute a claim against the state.
10. In the event there are no funds available for
payment of claims, then the division may suspend all action
related to valuing claims and granting awards until such
time as funds in excess of one hundred thousand dollars have
accumulated in the tort victims' compensation fund, at which
time the division shall resume its claim processing duties.
595.010. 1. As used in sections 595.010 to 595.075,
unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Child", a dependent, unmarried person who is
under eighteen years of age and includes a posthumous child,
stepchild, or an adopted child;
(2) "Claimant", a victim or a dependent, relative,
survivor, or member of the family, of a victim eligible for
compensation pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075;
(3) "Conservator", a person or corporation appointed
by a court to have the care and custody of the estate of a
minor or a disabled person, including a limited conservator;
(4) "Counseling", problem-solving and support
concerning emotional issues that result from criminal

SB 980 8
victimization licensed pursuant to section 595.030.
Counseling is a confidential service provided either on an
individual basis or in a group. Counseling has as a primary
purpose to enhance, protect and restore a person's sense of
well-being and social functioning after victimization.
Counseling does not include victim advocacy services such as
crisis telephone counseling, attendance at medical
procedures, law enforcement interviews or criminal justice
proceedings;
(5) "Crime", an act committed in this state which,
regardless of whether it is adjudicated, involves the
application of force or violence or the threat of force or
violence by the offender upon the victim but shall include
the crime of driving while intoxicated, vehicular
manslaughter and hit and run; and provided, further, that no
act involving the operation of a motor vehicle except
driving while intoxicated, vehicular manslaughter and hit
and run which results in injury to another shall constitute
a crime for the purpose of sections 595.010 to 595.075,
unless such injury was intentionally inflicted through the
use of a motor vehicle. A crime shall also include an act
of terrorism, as defined in 18 U.S.C. Section 2331, which
has been committed outside of the United States against a
resident of Missouri;
(6) "Crisis intervention counseling", helping to
reduce psychological trauma where victimization occurs;
(7) "Department", the department of public safety;
(8) "Dependent", mother, father, spouse, spouse's
mother, spouse's father, child, grandchild, adopted child,
illegitimate child, niece or nephew, who is wholly or
partially dependent for support upon, and living with, but
shall include children entitled to child support but not

SB 980 9
living with, the victim at the time of his injury or death
due to a crime alleged in a claim pursuant to sections
595.010 to 595.075;
(9) "Direct service", providing physical services to a
victim of crime including, but not limited to,
transportation, funeral arrangements, child care, emergency
food, clothing, shelter, notification and information;
(10) "Director", the director of public safety of this
state or a person designated by him for the purposes of
sections 595.010 to 595.075;
(11) "Disabled person", one who is unable by reason of
any physical or mental condition to receive and evaluate
information or to communicate decisions to such an extent
that the person lacks ability to manage his financial
resources, including a partially disabled person who lacks
the ability, in part, to manage his financial resources;
(12) ["Emergency service", those services provided to
alleviate the immediate effects of the criminal act or
offense, and may include cash grants of not more than one
hundred dollars;
(13)] "Earnings", net income or net wages;
(13) "Eligible injured victim", a person who, at the
time of application for compensation from the crime victims'
compensation fund, is:
(a) A citizen of the United States, a lawful permanent
resident, or a person lawfully present in the United States
under a valid visa issued by the United States Department of
State; and
(b) Killed or suffers personal physical injury in this
state as a result of:
a. The commission or attempted commission of any crime
by another person;

SB 980 10
b. A good-faith attempt to assist a person against
whom a crime is being committed or attempted; or
c. Assisting a law enforcement officer in the
apprehension of a person the officer has reason to believe
has committed or attempted to commit a crime;
(14) "Emergency service", those services provided to
alleviate the immediate effects of the criminal act or
offense, and may include cash grants of not more than one
hundred dollars;
[(14)] (15) "Family", the spouse, parent, grandparent,
stepmother, stepfather, child, grandchild, brother, sister,
half brother, half sister, adopted children of parent, or
spouse's parents;
[(15)] (16) "Funeral expenses", the expenses of the
funeral, burial, cremation or other chosen method of
interment, including plot or tomb and other necessary
incidents to the disposition of the remains;
[(16)] (17) "Gainful employment", engaging on a
regular and continuous basis, up to the date of the incident
upon which the claim is based, in a lawful activity from
which a person derives a livelihood;
100 [(17)] (18) "Guardian", one appointed by a court to
101 have the care and custody of the person of a minor or of an
102 incapacitated person, including a limited guardian;
103 [(18)] (19) "Hit and run", the crime of leaving the
104 scene of a motor vehicle accident as defined in section
105 577.060;
106 [(19)] (20) "Incapacitated person", one who is unable
107 by reason of any physical or mental condition to receive and
108 evaluate information or to communicate decisions to such an
109 extent that he lacks capacity to meet essential requirements
110 for food, clothing, shelter, safety or other care such that

SB 980 11
111 serious physical injury, illness, or disease is likely to
112 occur, including a partially incapacitated person who lacks
113 the capacity to meet, in part, such essential requirements;
114 [(20)] (21) "Injured victim", a person:
115 (a) Killed or receiving a personal physical injury in
116 this state as a result of another person's commission of or
117 attempt to commit any crime;
118 (b) Killed or receiving a personal physical injury in
119 this state while in a good faith attempt to assist a person
120 against whom a crime is being perpetrated or attempted;
121 (c) Killed or receiving a personal physical injury in
122 this state while assisting a law enforcement officer in the
123 apprehension of a person who the officer has reason to
124 believe has perpetrated or attempted a crime;
125 [(21)] (22) "Law enforcement official", a sheriff and
126 his regular deputies, municipal police officer or member of
127 the Missouri state highway patrol and such other persons as
128 may be designated by law as peace officers;
129 [(22)] (23) "Offender", a person who commits a crime;
130 [(23)] (24) "Personal injury", physical, emotional, or
131 mental harm or trauma resulting from the crime upon which
132 the claim is based;
133 [(24)] (25) "Private agency", a not-for-profit
134 corporation, in good standing in this state, which provides
135 services to victims of crime and their dependents;
136 [(25)] (26) "Public agency", a part of any local or
137 state government organization which provides services to
138 victims of crime;
139 [(26)] (27) "Relative", the spouse of the victim or a
140 person related to the victim within the third degree of
141 consanguinity or affinity as calculated according to civil
142 law;

SB 980 12
143 [(27)] (28) "Survivor", the spouse, parent, legal
144 guardian, grandparent, sibling or child of the deceased
145 victim of the victim's household at the time of the crime;
146 [(28)] (29) "Victim", a person who suffers personal
147 injury or death as a direct result of a crime, as defined in
148 subdivision (5) of this subsection;
149 [(29)] (30) "Victim advocacy", assisting the victim of
150 a crime and his dependents to acquire services from existing
151 community resources.
152 2. As used in sections 595.010 to 595.075, the term
153 "alcohol-related traffic offense" means those offenses
154 defined by sections 577.001, 577.010, and 577.012, and any
155 county or municipal ordinance which prohibits operation of a
156 motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol.
595.040. 1. Acceptance of any compensation under
sections 595.010 to 595.075 shall subrogate this state, to
the extent of such compensation paid, to any right or right
of action accruing to the claimant or to the victim to
recover payments on account of losses resulting from the
crime with respect to which the compensation has been paid.
The attorney general may enforce the subrogation, and he
shall bring suit to recover from any person to whom
compensation is paid, to the extent of the compensation
actually paid under sections 595.010 to 595.075, any amount
received by the claimant from any source exceeding the
actual loss to the victim.
2. The department shall have a lien on any
compensation received by the claimant, in addition to
compensation received under provisions of sections 595.010
to 595.075, for injuries or death resulting from the
incident upon which the claim is based. The claimant shall
retain, as trustee for the department, so much of the

SB 980 13
recovered funds as necessary to reimburse the Missouri crime
victims' compensation fund to the extent that compensation
was awarded to the claimant from that fund.
3. If a claimant initiates any legal proceeding to
recover restitution or damages related to the crime upon
which the claim is based, or if the claimant enters into
negotiations to receive any proceeds in settlement of a
claim for restitution or damages related to the crime, the
claimant shall give the department written notice within
fifteen days of the filing of the action or entering into
negotiations. The department may intervene in the
proceeding of a complainant to recover the compensation
awarded. If a claimant fails to give such written notice to
the department within the stated time period, or prior to
any attempt by claimant to reach a negotiated settlement of
claims for recovery of damages related to the crime upon
which the claim is based, the department's right of
subrogation to receive or recover funds from claimant, to
the extent that compensation was awarded by the department,
shall not be reduced in any amount or percentage by the
costs incurred by claimant attributable to such legal
proceedings or settlement, including, but not limited to,
attorney's fees, investigative cost or cost of court. If
such notice is given, [attorney] attorney's fees may be
awarded in an amount not to exceed [fifteen] ten percent of
the amount subrogated to the department.
4. Whenever compensation is awarded to a claimant who
is entitled to restitution from a criminal defendant, the
department may initiate restitution hearings in such
criminal proceedings or intervene in the same. The
department shall be entitled to receive restitution in such
proceedings to the extent compensation was awarded;

SB 980 14
provided, however, the department shall be exempt from the
payment of any fees or other charges for the recording of
restitution orders in the offices of the judges of probate.
The claimant shall notify this department when restitution
is ordered. Failure to notify the department will result in
possible forfeiture of any amount already received from the
department.
5. Whenever the department shall deem it necessary to
protect, maintain or enforce the department's right to
subrogation or to exercise any of its powers or to carry out
any of its duties or responsibilities, the attorney general
may initiate legal proceedings or intervene in legal
proceedings as the department's legal representative.
595.045. 1. There is established in the state
treasury the "Crime Victims' Compensation Fund". A
surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed
as costs in each court proceeding filed in any court in the
state in all criminal cases including violations of any
county ordinance or any violation of criminal or traffic
laws of the state, including an infraction and violation of
a municipal ordinance; except that no such fee shall be
collected in any proceeding in any court when the proceeding
or the defendant has been dismissed by the court or when
costs are to be paid by the state, county, or municipality.
A surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be
assessed as costs in a juvenile court proceeding in which a
child is found by the court to come within the applicable
provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
211.031.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the moneys collected by clerks of the courts
pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section

SB 980 15
shall be collected and disbursed in accordance with sections
488.010 to 488.020 and shall be payable to the director of
the department of revenue.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit annually the
amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state
forensic laboratory account administered by the department
of public safety to provide financial assistance to defray
expenses of crime laboratories if such analytical
laboratories are registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Agency or the Missouri department of health and
senior services. Subject to appropriations made therefor,
such funds shall be distributed by the department of public
safety to the crime laboratories serving the courts of this
state making analysis of a controlled substance or analysis
of blood, breath or urine in relation to a court proceeding.
4. The remaining funds collected under subsection 1 of
this section shall be denoted to the payment of an annual
appropriation for the administrative and operational costs
of the office for victims of crime and, if a statewide
automated crime victim notification system is established
pursuant to section 650.310, to the monthly payment of
expenditures actually incurred in the operation of such
system. Additional remaining funds shall be subject to the
following provisions:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall determine the
balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
available to satisfy the amount of compensation payable
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, excluding sections
595.050 and 595.055;
(2) [Beginning on September 1, 2004, and] On the first
of each month, the director of revenue or the director's

SB 980 16
designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds
available to the credit of the crime victims' compensation
fund and fifty percent to the services to victims' fund
established in section 595.100.
5. The director of revenue or such director's designee
shall at least monthly report the moneys paid pursuant to
this section into the crime victims' compensation fund and
the services to victims fund to the department of public
safety.
6. The moneys collected by clerks of municipal courts
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall be collected
and disbursed as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020.
Five percent of such moneys shall be payable to the city
treasury of the city from which such funds were collected.
The remaining ninety-five percent of such moneys shall be
payable to the director of revenue. The funds received by
the director of revenue pursuant to this subsection shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall determine the
balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
available to satisfy the amount of compensation payable
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, excluding sections
595.050 and 595.055;
(2) [Beginning on September 1, 2004, and] On the first
of each month the director of revenue or the director's
designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds
available to the credit of the crime victims' compensation
fund and fifty percent to the services to victims' fund
established in section 595.100.
7. These funds shall be subject to a biennial audit by
the Missouri state auditor. Such audit shall include all

SB 980 17
records associated with crime victims' compensation funds
collected, held or disbursed by any state agency.
8. In addition to the moneys collected pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section, the court shall enter a
judgment in favor of the state of Missouri, payable to the
crime victims' compensation fund, of sixty-eight dollars
upon a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for a class A or
B felony; forty-six dollars upon a plea of guilty or finding
of guilt for a class C, D, or E felony; and ten dollars upon
a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for any misdemeanor
under Missouri law except for those in chapter 252 relating
to fish and game, chapter 302 relating to drivers' and
commercial drivers' license, chapter 303 relating to motor
vehicle financial responsibility, chapter 304 relating to
traffic regulations, chapter 306 relating to watercraft
regulation and licensing, and chapter 307 relating to
100 vehicle equipment regulations. Any clerk of the court
101 receiving moneys pursuant to such judgments shall collect
102 and disburse such crime victims' compensation judgments in
103 the manner provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. Such
104 funds shall be payable to the state treasury and deposited
105 to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund.
106 9. The clerk of the court processing such funds shall
107 maintain records of all dispositions described in subsection
108 1 of this section and all dispositions where a judgment has
109 been entered against a defendant in favor of the state of
110 Missouri in accordance with this section; all payments made
111 on judgments for alcohol-related traffic offenses; and any
112 judgment or portion of a judgment entered but not
113 collected. These records shall be subject to audit by the
114 state auditor. The clerk of each court transmitting such
115 funds shall report separately the amount of dollars

SB 980 18
116 collected on judgments entered for alcohol-related traffic
117 offenses from other crime victims' compensation collections
118 or services to victims collections.
119 10. The department of revenue shall maintain records
120 of funds transmitted to the crime victims' compensation fund
121 by each reporting court and collections pursuant to
122 subsection 16 of this section and shall maintain separate
123 records of collection for alcohol-related offenses.
124 11. The state courts administrator shall include in
125 the annual report required by section 476.350 the circuit
126 court caseloads and the number of crime victims'
127 compensation judgments entered.
128 12. All awards made to eligible injured victims under
129 sections 595.010 to 595.105 and all appropriations for
130 administration of sections 595.010 to 595.105, except
131 sections 595.050 and 595.055, shall be made from the crime
132 victims' compensation fund. Any unexpended balance
133 remaining in the crime victims' compensation fund at the end
134 of each biennium shall not be subject to the provision of
135 section 33.080 requiring the transfer of such unexpended
136 balance to the ordinary revenue fund of the state, but shall
137 remain in the crime victims' compensation fund. In the
138 event that there are insufficient funds in the crime
139 victims' compensation fund to pay all claims in full, all
140 claims shall be paid on a pro rata basis. If there are no
141 funds in the crime victims' compensation fund, then no claim
142 shall be paid until funds have again accumulated in the
143 crime victims' compensation fund. When sufficient funds
144 become available from the fund, awards which have not been
145 paid shall be paid in chronological order with the oldest
146 paid first. In the event an award was to be paid in
147 installments and some remaining installments have not been

SB 980 19
148 paid due to a lack of funds, then when funds do become
149 available that award shall be paid in full. All such awards
150 on which installments remain due shall be paid in full in
151 chronological order before any other postdated award shall
152 be paid. Any award pursuant to this subsection is
153 specifically not a claim against the state, if it cannot be
154 paid due to a lack of funds in the crime victims'
155 compensation fund.
156 13. When judgment is entered against a defendant as
157 provided in this section and such sum, or any part thereof,
158 remains unpaid, there shall be withheld from any
159 disbursement, payment, benefit, compensation, salary, or
160 other transfer of money from the state of Missouri to such
161 defendant an amount equal to the unpaid amount of such
162 judgment. Such amount shall be paid forthwith to the crime
163 victims' compensation fund and satisfaction of such judgment
164 shall be entered on the court record. Under no
165 circumstances shall the general revenue fund be used to
166 reimburse court costs or pay for such judgment. The
167 director of the department of corrections shall have the
168 authority to pay into the crime victims' compensation fund
169 from an offender's compensation or account the amount owed
170 by the offender to the crime victims' compensation fund,
171 provided that the offender has failed to pay the amount owed
172 to the fund prior to entering a correctional facility of the
173 department of corrections.
174 14. All interest earned as a result of investing funds
175 in the crime victims' compensation fund shall be paid into
176 the crime victims' compensation fund and not into the
177 general revenue of this state.

SB 980 20
178 15. Any person who knowingly makes a fraudulent claim
179 or false statement in connection with any claim hereunder is
180 guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
181 16. The department may receive gifts and contributions
182 for the benefit of crime victims. Such gifts and
183 contributions shall be credited to the crime victims'
184 compensation fund as used solely for compensating victims
185 under the provisions of sections 595.010 to 595.075.
186 17. The department of public safety shall verify
187 compliance with the eligibility requirements of any claimant
188 purporting to be an eligible injured victim under this
189 section prior to authorizing payment from the crime victims'
190 compensation fund, and shall deny any claim that fails to
191 meet such requirements.
✓